California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(e) Repeated unexcused failure, whether or not willful, to transcribe notes of cases pending on appeal and to file the transcripts of those notes within the time required by law or to transcribe or file notes of other proceedings within the time required by law or agreed to by contract. Violation of this subdivision shall also be deemed an act endangering the public health, safety, or welfare within the meaning of Section 494.

(f) Loss or destruction of stenographic notes, whether on paper or electronic media, that prevents the production of a transcript due to negligence of the licensee.

(g) Failure to comply with, or to pay a monetary sanction imposed by, any court for failure to provide timely transcripts. The record of the court order, or a certified copy thereof, is conclusive evidence that the sanction was imposed.

(h) Failure to pay a civil penalty relating to the provision of court reporting services or products.

(i) The revocation of, suspension of, or other disciplinary action against a license to act as a certified shorthand reporter by another state. A certified copy of the revocation, suspension, or disciplinary action by the other state is conclusive evidence of that action.

(j) Violation of this chapter or the statutes, rules, and regulations pertaining to certified shorthand reporters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.1.

(a) In addition to the causes for discipline or denial of certification set forth in Section 8025, the board may suspend or revoke any certificate, or deny certification, on any of the following grounds:

(1) That the applicant or licensee is incapable of performing the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to physical or mental infirmity or incapacity.

(2) That the applicant or licensee is unable to perform the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to the abuse of chemical substances or alcohol.

(b) For purposes of determining the existence or nonexistence of grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license as set forth in this section, the board may, based upon a reasonable belief that grounds exist, require the applicant or licensee to submit to a physical or mental examination or examinations by a licensed physician as designated by the board. Failure to submit to, or to schedule, a physical or mental examination within 10 days of written demand by the board shall result in the automatic suspension of any license or the denial of any application. The denial of an application on any of the grounds set forth in this section shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 11504 and 11504.5 of the Government Code. The licensee may request a hearing to contest an automatic suspension of licensure under this section by sending a written request for hearing to the offices of the board within 12 days of the date that the board mails a notice of suspension to the licensee. If a hearing is requested, it shall be convened within 30 days after the receipt by the board of the written request for the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The sole issue for determination in the hearing, whether for denial or suspension of license, shall be whether the licensee failed or refused to submit to the physical or mental examination after being duly ordered to do so by the board. Evidence that the licensee has, since the date of automatic suspension, submitted to a mental or physical examination shall be considered as mitigation of any failure or refusal to comply with the board’s order, and may, in the sound discretion of the administrative law judge, constitute cause to set aside any automatic suspension. A decision shall be rendered by the administrative law judge within 10 days of the hearing and shall constitute the final determination as to the continuing status of any automatic suspension.

(c) Following a physical or mental examination pursuant to subdivision (b), the physician conducting the examination shall determine whether the applicant or licensee is incapable of performing the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to physical or mental infirmity or incapacity, or whether the applicant or licensee is unable to perform the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to the abuse of chemical substances or alcohol. Where a medical determination is made that an impairment exists, and the finding is reported to the board, the board shall deny any application and any license shall be automatically suspended. The denial of an application on these grounds shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 11504 and 11504.5 of the Government Code. The licensee may request a hearing to contest an automatic suspension of licensure under this section by sending a written request for hearing to the offices of the board within 12 days of the date that the board mails a notice of suspension to the licensee. If a hearing is requested, it shall be convened within 30 days after the receipt by the board of the written request for hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The sole issue for determination in the hearing, whether for denial or suspension of license, shall be whether the applicant or licensee is incapable of performing the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to physical or mental infirmity or incapacity, or whether the applicant or licensee is unable to perform the duties of a certified shorthand reporter due to the abuse of chemical substances or alcohol.

(d) For purposes of the hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (c), the applicant or licensee shall, at a minimum, have the following rights:

(1) To be represented by counsel.

(2) To have a record made of the proceedings, copies of which may be obtained by the licentiate upon payment of any reasonable charges associated with the record.

(3) To call, examine, and cross-examine witnesses.

(4) To present and rebut evidence determined to be relevant.

(5) To present oral argument.

(e) The statutory period governing reapplication for licensure following denial of the application as set forth in Section 486 does not apply to licenses denied under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8026.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a certified shorthand reporter is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article.

The board may order the certificate suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a certificate, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

8027.

(a) As used in this section, “school” means a court reporter training program or an institution that provides a course of instruction approved by the board and the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, is a public school in this state, or is accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges.

(b) A court reporting school shall be primarily organized to train students for the practice of shorthand reporting, as defined in Sections 8016 and 8017. Its educational program shall be on the postsecondary or collegiate level. It shall be legally organized and authorized to conduct its program under all applicable laws of the state, and shall conform to and offer all components of
 the minimum prescribed course of study established by the board. Its records shall be kept and shall be maintained in a manner to render them safe from theft, fire, or other loss. The records shall indicate positive daily and clock-hour attendance of each student for all classes, apprenticeship and graduation reports, high school transcripts or the equivalent or self-certification of high school graduation or the equivalent, transcripts of other education, and student progress to date, including all progress and counseling reports.

(c) Any school intending to offer a program in court reporting shall notify the board within 30 days of the date on which it provides notice to, or seeks approval from, the State Department of Education, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the Office of the Chancellor of the California
 Community Colleges, or the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, whichever is applicable. The board shall review the proposed curriculum and provide the school tentative approval, or notice of denial, within 60 days of receipt of the notice. The school shall apply for provisional recognition pursuant to subdivision (d) within no more than one year from the date it begins offering court reporting classes.

(d) The board may grant provisional recognition to a new court reporting school upon satisfactory evidence that it has met all of the provisions of subdivision (b) and this subdivision. Recognition may be granted by the board to a provisionally recognized school after it has been in continuous operation for a period of no less than three consecutive years from the date provisional recognition was granted, during which period the
 school shall provide satisfactory evidence that at least one person has successfully completed the entire course of study established by the board and complied with the provisions of Section 8020, and has been issued a certificate to practice shorthand reporting as defined in Sections 8016 and 8017. The board may, for good cause shown, extend the three-year provisional recognition period for not more than one year. Failure to meet the provisions and terms of this section shall require the board to deny recognition. Once granted, recognition may be withdrawn by the board for failure to comply with all applicable laws and regulations.

(e) Application for recognition of a court reporting school shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall be accompanied by all evidence, statements, or documents requested. Each branch,
 extension center, or off-campus facility requires separate application.

(f) All recognized and provisionally recognized court reporting schools shall notify the board of any change in school name, address, telephone number, responsible court reporting program manager, owner of private schools, and the effective date thereof, within 30 days of the change. All of these notifications shall be made in writing.

(g) A school shall notify the board in writing immediately of the discontinuance or pending discontinuance of its court reporting program or any of the program’s components. Within two years of the date this notice is sent to the board, the school shall discontinue its court reporting program in its entirety. The board may, for good cause shown, grant not more than two
 one-year extensions of this period to a school. If a student is to be enrolled after this notice is sent to the board, a school shall disclose to the student the fact of the discontinuance or pending discontinuance of its court reporting program or any of its program components.

(h) The board shall maintain a roster of currently recognized and provisionally recognized court reporting schools, including, but not limited to, the name, address, telephone number, and the name of the responsible court reporting program manager of each school.

(i) The board shall maintain statistics that display the number and passing percentage of all first-time examinees, including, but not limited to, those qualified by each recognized or provisionally recognized school and those first-time examinees
 qualified by other methods as defined in Section 8020.

(j) Inspections and investigations shall be conducted by the board as necessary to carry out this section, including, but not limited to, unannounced site visits.

(k) All recognized and provisionally recognized schools shall print in their school or course catalog the name, address, and telephone number of the board. At a minimum, the information shall be in 8-point bold type and include the following statement:

 

“IN ORDER FOR A PERSON TO QUALIFY FROM A SCHOOL TO TAKE THE STATE LICENSING EXAMINATION, THE PERSON SHALL COMPLETE A PROGRAM AT A RECOGNIZED SCHOOL. FOR INFORMATION CONCERNING THE MINIMUM
 REQUIREMENTS THAT A COURT REPORTING PROGRAM MUST MEET IN ORDER TO BE RECOGNIZED, CONTACT: THE COURT REPORTERS BOARD OF CALIFORNIA; (ADDRESS); (TELEPHONE NUMBER).”

 

(l) Each court reporting school shall file with the board, not later than June 30 of each year, a current school catalog that shows all course offerings and staff, and for private schools, the owner, except that where there have been no changes to the catalog within the previous year, no catalog need be sent. In addition, each school shall also file with the board a statement certifying whether the school is in compliance with all statutes and the rules and regulations of the board, signed by the responsible court reporting program manager.

(m) A school offering court reporting shall not make any written or verbal claims of employment opportunities or potential earnings unless those claims are based on verified data and reflect current employment conditions.

(n) If a school offers a course of instruction that exceeds the board’s minimum requirements, the school shall disclose orally and in writing the board’s minimum requirements and how the course of instruction differs from those criteria. The school shall make this disclosure before a prospective student executes an agreement obligating that person to pay any money to the school for the course of instruction. The school shall also make this disclosure to all students enrolled on January 1, 2002.

(o) Private and public schools shall provide each prospective student
 with all of the following and have the prospective student sign a document that shall become part of that individual’s permanent record, acknowledging receipt of each item:

(1) A student consumer information brochure published by the board.

(2) A list of the school’s graduation requirements, including the number of tests, the pass point of each test, the speed of each test, and the type of test, such as jury charge or literary.

(3) A list of requirements to qualify for the state-certified shorthand reporter licensing examination, including the number of tests, the pass point of each test, the speed of each test, and the type of test, such as jury charge or literary, if different than those requirements listed in paragraph
 (2).

(4) A copy of the school’s board-approved benchmarks for satisfactory progress as identified in subdivision (u).

(5) A report showing the number of students from the school who qualified for each of the certified shorthand reporter licensing examinations within the preceding two years, the number of those students that passed each examination, the time, as of the date of qualification, that each student was enrolled in court reporting school, and the placement rate for all students that passed each examination.

(6) On and after January 1, 2005, the school shall also provide to prospective students the number of hours each currently enrolled student who has qualified to take the next licensing test, exclusive of
 transfer students, has attended court reporting classes.

(p) All enrolled students shall have the information in subdivisions (n) and (o) on file no later than June 30, 2005.

(q) Public schools shall provide the information in subdivisions (n) and (o) to each new student the first day they attend theory or machine speed class, if it was not provided previously.

(r) Each enrolled student shall be provided written notification of any change in qualification or graduation requirements that is being implemented due to the requirements of any one of the school’s oversight agencies. This notice shall be provided to each affected student at least 30 days before the effective date of the change and shall state the new requirement and the name,
 address, and telephone number of the agency that is requiring it of the school. Each student shall initial and date a document acknowledging receipt of that information and that document, or a copy thereof, shall be made part of the student’s permanent file.

(s) Schools shall make available a comprehensive final examination in each academic subject to any student desiring to challenge an academic class in order to obtain credit towards certification for the state licensing examination. The points required to pass a challenge examination shall not be higher than the minimum points required of other students completing the academic class.

(t) An individual serving as a teacher, instructor, or reader shall meet the qualifications specified by regulation for their position.

(u) Each school shall provide a substitute teacher or instructor for any class for which the teacher or instructor is absent for two consecutive days or more.

(v) The board has the authority to approve or disapprove benchmarks for satisfactory progress which each school shall develop for its court reporting program. Schools shall use only board-approved benchmarks to comply with the provisions of paragraph (4) of subdivision (o) and subdivision (u).

(w) Each school shall counsel each student a minimum of one time within each 12-month period to identify the level of attendance and progress, and the prognosis for completing the requirements to become eligible to sit for the state licensing examination. If the student
 has not progressed in accordance with the board-approved benchmarks for that school, the student shall be counseled a minimum of one additional time within that same 12-month period.

(x) The school shall provide to the board, for each student qualifying through the school as eligible to sit for the state licensing examination, the number of hours the student attended court reporting classes, both academic and machine speed classes, including theory.

(y) The pass rate of first-time examination takers for each school offering court reporting shall meet or exceed the average pass rate of all first-time test takers for a majority of examinations given for the preceding three years. Failure to do so shall require the board to conduct a review of the program. In addition, the board may place
 the school on probation and may withdraw recognition if the school continues to place below the above-described standard on the two examinations that follow the three-year period.

(z) A school shall not require more than one 10-minute qualifying examination, as defined in the regulations of the board, for a student to be eligible to sit for the state certification examination.

(aa) A school shall provide the board the actual number of hours of attendance for each applicant the school qualifies for the state licensing examination.

(ab) The board shall, by December 1, 2001, do the following by regulation as necessary:

(1) Establish the format that shall be used
 by schools to report tracking of all attendance hours and actual timeframes for completed coursework.

(2) Require schools to provide a minimum of 10 hours of live
 dictation class each school week for every full-time student.

(3) Require schools to provide students with the opportunity to read back from their stenographic notes a minimum of one time each day to their instructor.

(4) Require schools to provide students with the opportunity to practice with a school-approved speed-building audio recording, or other assigned material, a minimum of one hour per day after school hours as a homework assignment and provide the notes from this audio recording to their instructor the following day for review.

(5) Develop standardization of policies on the use and administration of qualifier examinations by schools.

(6) Define qualifier examination as follows: the qualifier examination shall consist of 4-voice testimony of 10-minute duration at 200 words per minute, graded at 95 percent accuracy, and in accordance with the guidelines followed by the board. Schools shall be required to date and number each qualifier and announce the date and number to the students at the time of administering the qualifier. All qualifiers shall indicate the actual dictation time of the test and the school shall catalog and maintain the qualifier for a period of not less than three years for the purpose of inspection by the board.

(7) Require schools to develop a program to provide students with the opportunity to interact with professional court reporters to provide skill support, mentoring, or counseling that they can document at least quarterly.

(8) Define qualifications and educational requirements required of instructors and readers that read test material and qualifiers.

(ac) The board shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this section not later than September 1, 2002.

(ad) The board may recover costs for any additional expenses incurred under the enactment amending this section in the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature pursuant to its fee authority in Section 8031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 22.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8027.5.

In addition to the authority to conduct disciplinary proceedings under this chapter, the board, through its duly authorized representatives, shall have authority to issue administrative citations or assess fines for the violation of any rules and regulations adopted by the board under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 615, Sec. 13.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revenue [8030. - 8031.]

8030.

All fees and other revenues received by the board shall be reported promptly to the State Controller and shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to be placed in the Court Reporters’ Fund, which fund is continued in existence in the State Treasury, and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to carry out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 463, Sec. 6.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.1.

The board may use existing resources to undertake efforts to publicize the availability of the Transcript Reimbursement Fund, established pursuant to Section 8030.2, to prospective applicants through appropriate entities serving these applicants, including the State Bar of California, the California Commission on Access to Justice, and the Legal Aid Association of California. These efforts shall be described in the report required by Section 8030.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   (AB 2192)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.2.

(a) (1) To provide shorthand reporting services to low-income litigants in civil cases, who are unable to otherwise afford those services, funds generated by fees received by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8031 in excess of funds needed to support the board’s operating budget for the fiscal year in which a transfer described below is made shall be used by the board for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a Transcript Reimbursement Fund. The Transcript Reimbursement Fund shall be funded by a transfer of funds from the Court Reporters’ Fund in the amount of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) annually. The board is authorized to transfer funds in increments of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a total of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). Notwithstanding any
 other provision of this article, a transfer to the Transcript Reimbursement Fund in excess of the fund balance established at the beginning of each fiscal year shall not be made by the board if the transfer will result in the reduction of the balance of the Court Reporters’ Fund to an amount less than six months’ operating budget.

(2) If funds are appropriated to the Transcript Reimbursement Fund from a source other than fees received by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8031, those funds shall not be subject to the annual transfer limit of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) described in paragraph (1).

(b) Refunds and unexpended funds that are anticipated to remain in the Transcript Reimbursement Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be considered by the board in establishing the fee assessment pursuant to Section 8031 so that the assessment shall maintain
 the level of funding for the Transcript Reimbursement Fund, as specified in subdivision (a), in the following fiscal year.

(c) The Transcript Reimbursement Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Transcript Reimbursement Fund are continuously appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(d) (1) Applicants who have been reimbursed pursuant to this chapter for services provided to litigants and who are awarded court costs or attorney’s fees by judgment or by settlement agreement shall refund the full amount of that reimbursement to the fund within 90 days of receipt of the award or settlement.

(2) An applicant appearing pro se who has been reimbursed for services provided to litigants under this chapter shall refund the
 full amount reimbursed if a court orders the applicant’s fee waiver withdrawn or denied retroactively pursuant to Section 68636 of the Government Code, within 90 days of the court’s order withdrawing or denying the fee waiver.

(e) Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board shall maintain the fund at a level that is sufficient to pay all qualified claims. To accomplish this objective, the board shall utilize all refunds, unexpended funds, fees, and any other moneys received by the board.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 16346 of the Government Code, all unencumbered funds remaining in the Transcript Reimbursement Fund as of January 1, 2029, shall be transferred to the Court Reporters’ Fund.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 8.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.4.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Applicant” means a qualified legal services project, qualified support center, other qualified project, or pro bono attorney applying to receive funds from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund established by this chapter. The term “applicant” includes an indigent person appearing pro se to represent themselves at any stage of the case and applying to receive funds from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund established in Section 8030.2.

(b) “Case” means a single legal proceeding from its inception, through all levels of hearing, trial, and appeal, until its ultimate conclusion and disposition.

(c) “Certified shorthand reporter” means a
 shorthand reporter certified pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 8020) performing shorthand reporting services pursuant to Section 8017.

(d) “Developmentally Disabled Assistance Act” means the Developmentally Disabled Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 1975 (Public Law 94-103), as amended.

(e) “Fee-generating case” means any case or matter that, if undertaken on behalf of an eligible client by an attorney in private practice, reasonably may be expected to result in payment of a fee for legal services from an award to a client, from public funds, or from an opposing party. A reasonable expectation as to payment of a legal fee exists wherever a client enters into a contingent fee agreement with the client’s lawyer. If there is no contingent fee agreement, a case is not considered fee generating if adequate representation is deemed to be unavailable because of the
 occurrence of any of the following circumstances:

(1) If the applicant has determined that referral is not possible because of any of the following:

(A) The case has been rejected by the local lawyer referral service, or if there is no such service, by two private attorneys who have experience in the subject matter of the case.

(B) Neither the referral service nor any lawyer will consider the case without payment of a consultation fee.

(C) The case is of the type that private attorneys in the area ordinarily do not accept, or do not accept without prepayment of a fee.

(D) Emergency circumstances compel immediate action before referral can be made, but the client is advised that, if
 appropriate and consistent with professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a later time.

(2) If recovery of damages is not the principal object of the case and a request for damages is merely ancillary to an action for equitable or other nonpecuniary relief or inclusion of a counterclaim requesting damages is necessary for effective defense or because of applicable rules governing joinder of counterclaims.

(3) If a court appoints an applicant or an employee of an applicant pursuant to a statute or a court rule or practice of equal applicability to all attorneys in the jurisdiction.

(4) In any case involving the rights of a claimant under a public-supported benefit program for which entitlement to benefit is based on need.

(f) (1) “Indigent person” means any of the following:

(A) A person whose income is 125 percent or less of the current poverty threshold established by the United States Office of Management and Budget.

(B) A person who is eligible for supplemental security income.

(C) A person who is eligible for, or receiving, free services under the federal Older Americans Act or the Developmentally Disabled Assistance Act.

(D) A person whose income is 75 percent or less of the maximum level of income for lower income households as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for purposes of a program that provides legal assistance by an attorney in private practice on a pro bono basis.

(E) A person who qualifies for a waiver of fees pursuant to Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the income of a person who is disabled shall be determined after deducting the costs of medical and other disability-related special expenses.

(g) “Lawyer referral service” means a lawyer referral program authorized by the State Bar of California pursuant to the rules of professional conduct.

(h) “Legal Services Corporation” means the Legal Services Corporation established under the Legal Services Corporation Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-355), as amended.

(i) “Older Americans Act” means the Older Americans Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-73), as amended.

(j) “Other qualified project” means a nonprofit organization formed for charitable or other public purposes, that does not receive funds from the Legal Services Corporation or pursuant to the federal Older Americans Act, and provides free legal services to indigent persons.

(k) “Pro bono attorney” means any attorney, law firm, or legal corporation, licensed to practice law in this state, that undertakes, without charge to the party, the representation of an indigent person, referred by a qualified legal services project, qualified support center, or other qualified project, in a case not considered to be fee generating, as defined in this chapter.

(l) “Qualified legal services project” means a nonprofit project, incorporated and operated exclusively in California, that provides as its primary purpose and function legal services without charge to indigent persons, has
 a board of directors or advisory board composed of both attorneys and consumers of legal services, and provides for community participation in legal services programming. A legal services project funded, either in whole or in part, by the Legal Services Corporation or with the federal Older Americans Act funds is presumed to be a qualified legal services project for the purposes of this chapter.

(m) “Qualified support center” means an incorporated nonprofit legal services center that has an office or offices in California that provide legal services or technical assistance without charge to qualified legal services projects and their clients on a multicounty basis in California. A support center funded, either in whole or in part, by the Legal Services Corporation or with the federal Older Americans Act funds is presumed to be a qualified legal services project for the purposes of this chapter.

(n) “Rules of professional conduct” means those rules adopted by the State Bar of California pursuant to Sections 6076 and 6077.

(o) “Supplemental security income recipient” means an individual receiving or eligible to receive payments under Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Public Law 92-603), as amended, or payment under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(p) “Vexatious litigant” means a person as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 391 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 9.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.6.

(a) The board shall disburse funds from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund for the costs, exclusive of per diem charges by official reporters, of preparing either an original transcript and one copy thereof, or where appropriate, a copy of the transcript, of court or deposition proceedings, or both, incurred as a contractual obligation between the shorthand reporter and the applicant, for litigation conducted in California. If there is no deposition transcript, the board may reimburse the applicant or the certified shorthand reporter designated in the application for per diem costs. The rate of per diem for depositions shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for one-half day, or one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) for a full day. If a transcript is ordered within one year of the date of the deposition, but subsequent to
 the per diem having been reimbursed by the Transcript Reimbursement Fund, the amount of the per diem shall be deducted from the regular customary charges for a transcript. Reimbursement may be obtained pursuant to the following provisions:

(1) The applicant or certified shorthand reporter shall promptly submit to the board the certified shorthand reporter’s invoice for transcripts together with the appropriate documentation as is required by this chapter.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the board shall promptly determine if the applicant or the certified shorthand reporter is entitled to reimbursement under this chapter and shall make payment as follows:

(A) Regular customary charges for preparation of original deposition transcripts and one copy thereof, or a copy of the transcripts.

(B) Regular customary charges for expedited deposition transcripts up to a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per case.

(C) Regular customary charges for the preparation of original transcripts and one copy thereof, or a copy of transcripts of court proceedings.

(D) Regular customary charges for expedited or daily charges for preparation of original transcripts and one copy thereof or a copy of transcripts of court proceedings.

(E) The charges shall not include notary or handling fees. The charges may include actual shipping costs and exhibits, except that the cost of exhibits may not exceed thirty-five cents ($0.35) each or a total of thirty-five dollars ($35) per transcript.

(3) The maximum amount reimbursable by the fund under paragraph (2) shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per case per year.

(4) A vexatious litigant shall be ineligible to receive funds from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund. However, a vexatious litigant may become eligible to receive funds if the vexatious litigant is no longer subject to the provisions of Title 3A (commencing with Section 391) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure pursuant to Section 391.8 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(5) Disbursements to cover the costs of providing transcripts to all applicants appearing pro se pursuant to this section shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per case.

(6) If entitled, and funds are available, the board shall disburse the appropriate sum to the applicant or the
 certified shorthand reporter when the documentation described in Section 8030.8 accompanies the application. A notice shall be sent to the recipient requiring the recipient to file a notice with the court in which the action is pending stating the sum of reimbursement paid pursuant to this section. The notice filed with the court shall also state that if the sum is subsequently included in any award of costs made in the action, that the sum is to be ordered refunded by the applicant to the Transcript Reimbursement Fund whenever the sum is actually recovered as costs. The court shall not consider whether payment has been made from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund in determining the appropriateness of any award of costs to the parties. The board shall also notify the applicant that the reimbursed sum has been paid to the certified shorthand reporter and shall notify the applicant of the duty to refund any of the sum actually recovered as costs in the action.

(7) If not entitled, the board shall return a copy of the invoice to the applicant and the designated certified shorthand reporter together with a notice stating the grounds for denial.

(8) The board shall complete its actions under this section within 30 days of receipt of the invoice and all required documentation, including a completed application.

(9) Applications for reimbursements from the fund shall be filed on a first-come-first-served basis.

(10) Applications for reimbursement that cannot be paid from the fund due to insufficiency of the fund for that fiscal year shall be held over until the next fiscal year to be paid out of the renewed fund. Applications held over shall be given a priority standing in the next fiscal year.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 587, Sec. 10.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8030.8.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, documentation accompanying an invoice is sufficient to establish entitlement for reimbursement from the Transcript Reimbursement Fund if it is filed with the executive officer on an application form prescribed by the board that is complete in all respects, and that establishes all of the following:

(1) The case name and number and that the litigant or litigants requesting the reimbursement are indigent persons. If the applicant is an indigent person appearing pro se the application shall be accompanied by a copy of the fee waiver form approved by the court in the matter for which the applicant seeks reimbursement.
